Wisconsin, session 2025, AB894.
do enact as follows:AB894,11Section 1. 100.56 of the statutes is created to read:AB894,2,62100.56 Gift obligations. (1) Definition. In this section, “gift obligation” 3means an obligation, evidenced by a gift certificate, gift card, or other object or 4document marketed as a gift, to accept the gift certificate, gift card, or other object 5or document from the holder as payment, up to a specified amount, for a person’s 6goods or services.AB894,2,107(2) Expiration dates. No person may sell a gift obligation that has an 8expiration date that is earlier than 5 years after the date on which the gift 9obligation was sold or, if the gift obligation is reloadable, 5 years after the date on 10which funds were last loaded to the gift obligation.AB894,2,1311(3) Imposition of fees or charges. No person may impose a dormancy, 12inactivity, or service fee with respect to a gift obligation unless all of the following 13apply:AB894,2,1514(a) There has been no activity with respect to the gift obligation in the one-15year period ending on the date on which the fee is charged.AB894,2,1716(b) All of the following are stated clearly and conspicuously on the gift 17obligation:AB894,2,18181. The amount of any dormancy, inactivity, or service fee that may be charged.AB894,2,19192. How often such fee may be charged.AB894,3,113. If applicable, that such fee may be charged for inactivity.AB894,3,22(c) No more than one fee is charged in any given month.AB894,3,73(4) Penalties and remedies. (a) Any person who suffers a pecuniary loss 4because of a violation of this section may commence an action for the pecuniary loss. 5If the person prevails, the person shall recover twice the amount of the pecuniary 6loss or $200 for each violation, whichever is greater, together with costs, including 7reasonable attorney fees, notwithstanding s. 814.04 (1).AB894,3,118(b) The department may commence an action in the name of the state to 9restrain by temporary or permanent injunction a violation of this section. Before 10entry of final judgment, the court may make any necessary orders to restore to any 11person any pecuniary loss suffered by the person because of the violation.AB894,3,1412(c) The department or any district attorney may commence an action in the 13name of the state to recover a forfeiture to the state of not less than $100 nor more 14than $10,000 for each violation of this section.AB894,215Section 2. 165.25 (4) (ar) of the statutes is amended to read:AB894,3,2216165.25 (4) (ar) The department of justice shall furnish all legal services 17required by the department of agriculture, trade and consumer protection relating 18to the enforcement of ss. 91.68, 93.73, 100.171, 100.173, 100.174, 100.175, 100.177, 19100.18, 100.182, 100.195, 100.20, 100.205, 100.207, 100.209, 100.21, 100.28, 20100.37, 100.42, 100.50, 100.51, 100.55, 100.56, and 846.45 and chs. 126, 136, 344, 21704, 707, and 779, together with any other services as are necessarily connected to 22the legal services.AB894,323Section 3. Initial applicability.AB894,4,21(1) This act first applies to a gift obligation, as defined in s. 100.56 (1), that is 2sold on the effective date of this subsection.AB894,4,33